Maryland, session 2025, HB0054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–213.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Facilities” means hospitals and related institutions whose rates have
been approved by the Commission.
(b) The Commission shall assess and collect user fees on facilities as defined in
this section.
(c) (1) The total fees assessed by the Commission may not exceed the greater
of:
– 1 –

Ch. 25 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) 0.1% of the immediately preceding fiscal year’s budgeted,
regulated, gross hospital revenue; or
(ii) The largest amount determined under this paragraph for a fiscal
year during the immediately preceding 5 fiscal years.
(2) The total user fees assessed by the Commission may not exceed the
Special Fund appropriation for the Commission by more than 20%.
(3) The user fees assessed by the Commission shall be used exclusively to
cover the actual documented direct costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties of
the Commission in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle and any administrative
costs for services to the Commission provided by the Department.
(4) The Commission shall pay all funds collected from fees assessed in
accordance with this section into the Health Services Cost Review Commission Fund.
(5) The user fees assessed by the Commission may be expended only for
purposes authorized by the provisions of this subtitle.
(6) The amount specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection limits only the
total user fees the Commission may assess in a fiscal year.
Chapter 696 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2022. [Section 1 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and,
at the end of June 30, 2025, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
Chapter 697 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2022. [Section 1 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and,
at the end of June 30, 2025, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –